New York, session 2025-2026, S4989.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public service law is amended by adding a new section 2 28 to read as follows: 3 § 28. Notice of planned rate increase for services. 1. Any gas corpo- 4 ration, electric corporation, water corporation or municipality, steam 5 corporation or telephone corporation shall be required to disclose to a 6 consumer any planned rate increase for services being rendered to such 7 consumer, within thirty days before such planned rate increase takes 8 effect. 9 2. (a) Any notification of a planned rate increase pursuant to this 10 section shall be communicated to the consumer in a clear and conspicuous 11 method which is sufficient to alert such consumer that such planned rate 12 increase is occurring. 13 (b) A consumer shall be notified in a separate communication outside 14 of any billing statement via phone, electronic mail, letter, text EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09684-04-6 S. 4989--B 2 1 message or any combination thereof that includes a statement of the 2 following: 3 (i) the amount of the rate increase; 4 (ii) the effective date of the increase; and 5 (iii) where customers can get additional information pertaining to the 6 rate increase. 7 (c) Inclusion of such notification as part of any billing statement 8 shall not constitute compliance with this section. 9 3. Any gas corporation, electric corporation, water corporation or 10 municipality, steam corporation or telephone corporation shall provide 11 with any notification of a planned rate increase information on how a 12 consumer can contact the service provider. 13 § 2. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 399- 14 ww to read as follows: 15 § 399-ww. Notice of planned rate increases for cable and internet 16 services. 1. Any cable television company, internet service provider as 17 defined by section three hundred ninety-four-cc of this article, or 18 voice over internet protocol or VoIP provider as defined by section 19 three hundred forty-nine-b-1 of this chapter shall be required to 20 disclose to a consumer any planned rate increase for services being 21 rendered to such consumer, within thirty but no less than seven days 22 before such planned rate increase takes effect. 23 2. (a) Any notification of a planned rate increase pursuant to this 24 section shall be communicated to the consumer in a clear and conspicuous 25 method which is sufficient to alert such consumer that such planned rate 26 increase is occurring. 27 (b) A consumer shall be notified in a separate communication outside 28 of any billing statement via phone, electronic mail, letter, text 29 message or any combination thereof that includes a statement of the 30 following: 31 (i) the amount of the rate increase; 32 (ii) the effective date of the increase; and 33 (iii) where customers can get additional information pertaining to the 34 rate increase. 35 (c) Inclusion of such notification as part of any billing statement 36 shall not constitute compliance with this section. 37 3. Any cable television company, internet service provider, or VoIP 38 provider shall provide with any notification of a planned rate increase 39 information on how a consumer can contact the service provider and shall 40 also include a mechanism to allow for a consumer to cancel their service 41 altogether. 42 § 3. Section 1020-cc of the public authorities law is amended by 43 adding a new subdivision 3 to read as follows: 44 3. Service providers shall be subject to the provisions of section 45 twenty-eight of the public service law. 46 § 4. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 47 it shall have become a law.